Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.002

Board considered parole board.

The indeterminate sentence review board, in fulfilling its duties under the provisions of chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess., shall be considered a parole board as that concept was treated in law under the state's indeterminate sentencing statutes.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 363.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.